Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,277
Food processing plants and salvage operations; compliance required.

Food processing plants and salvage operations shall comply with the federal Current Good Manufacturing Practice adopted in section 81-2,259.

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB771, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 11.